Hawaii statutes.
[§89E-5] Reemployment. Any employee
who has received either a severance benefit or a special retirement benefit
under this chapter and returns to public service within two years as an
employee or contractor shall repay the severance benefit or the special
retirement benefit to the State or the employees' retirement system, as the
case may be, within thirty days of reemployment with a public employer. [L Sp
2016 2d, c 1, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next